DTC B1318 [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]
id0102c3842300
DTC B1318 |
Fuel additive control module B+ voltage low |
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DETECTION CONDITION
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• The Fuel additive control module monitors the supply voltage of battery positive terminal at fuel additive control module terminals 1 and 3. If the fuel additive control module detected battery positive terminal voltage below 10 V during 20 seconds, the fuel additive control module determines that the power supply system has malfunction.
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POSSIBLE CAUSE
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• Melt down fuse
• Open circuit in wiring between ENG +B fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 1
• Short to ground between ENG +B fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 1
• Open circuit in wiring between ENGINE fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 3
• Short to ground between ENGINE fuse and fuel additive control module terminal 3
• Poor connection of fuel additive control module connector
• PCM malfunction
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Diagnostic procedure
STEP |
INSPECTION |
ACTION |
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1
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VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
• Has the FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
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2
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VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
• Verify related service repair information availability.
• Is any related repair information available?
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Yes
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Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
• If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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3
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERNS TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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4
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VERIFY CURRENT SIGNAL STATUS: IS CONCERN INTERMITTENT OR CONSTANT?
• Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
• Clear the DTC from the PCM memory using the M-MDS.
• Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Intermittent concern exists.
Perform the “INTERMITTENT CONCERNS TROUBLESHOOTING”.
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5
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INSPECT POWER SUPPLY CIRCUIT
• Turn the engine switch to off.
• Measure voltage between fuel additive control module terminal 1 (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness, then go to Step 8.
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6
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INSPECT IG1 SIGNAL CIRCUIT
• Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
• Measure voltage between fuel additive control module terminal 3 (wiring harness-side) and body ground.
• Is the voltage B+?
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Yes
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Go to the next step.
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No
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Repair or replace the wiring harness, then go to Step 8.
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7
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INSPECT FUEL ADDITIVE CONTROL MODULE CONNECTOR FOR POOR CONNECTION
• Disconnect fuel additive control module connector.
• Inspect for poor connection (such as damaged, pulled-out terminals, corrosion).
• Is there any malfunction?
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Yes
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Repair terminals, then go to Step 8.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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8
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VERIFY THAT DTC B1318 TROUBLESHOOTING IS COMPLETED
• Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
• Clear DTC from PCM memory using M-MDS.
• Run the vehicle under the FREEZE FRAME DATA stored condition.
• Is the same DTC present?
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Yes
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Replace the Fuel additive control module, then go to the next step.
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No
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Go to the next step.
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9
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VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
• Perform the after repair procedure.
• Are any DTCs present?
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Yes
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Go to the applicable DTC inspection.
(See DTC TABLE [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
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No
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DTC troubleshooting completed.
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